Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2478.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Arizona commission on student outcomes; members; duties; reporting requirements; delayed repeal A. The Arizona commission on student outcomes is established to analyze, review and recommend improvements to the current K-12 education system in this state. B. The commission is composed of the following members: 1. Three members who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, not more than two of whom are members of the same political party.  The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate one of the members to serve as cochairperson of the commission. 2. Three members who are appointed by the president of the senate, not more than two of whom are members of the same political party.  The president of the senate shall designate one of the members to serve as cochairperson of the commission. 3. One member who is appointed by the governor. 4. The superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee. 5. One member who represents a nonprofit organization that produces research on economic and educational policies and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 6. One person who represents a statewide taxpayer organization and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 7. One person who represents an organization that represents school district governing boards and who is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 8. One person who represents an organization that represents charter schools and who is appointed by the president of the senate. 9. One member who represents an organization that represents school district administrators in this state and who is appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. 10. One member who is a teacher in a public school in this state and who is appointed by the minority leader of the senate. C. Commission members are not eligible to receive compensation but are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes. D. Meetings of the commission are subject to the requirements of title 38, chapter 3, article 3.1, Arizona Revised Statutes. E. The commission shall appoint an executive director who serves at the pleasure of the commission. The executive director is eligible to receive compensation pursuant to section 38-611, Arizona Revised Statutes. F. The commission shall: 1. Analyze school district expenditures of local, state and federal monies to determine how resources are aligned with the core instructional priorities identified by the commission. 2. Review and analyze the adequacy of early childhood education programs and services that are offered in this state. 3. Identify state laws, rules that are adopted by the state board of education and policies that are adopted by school district governing boards or charter school governing bodies that might not direct resources toward positive instructional outcomes. 4. Examine barriers and challenges to teacher compensation and workforce readiness. 5. Assess whether the oversight and accountability programs and systems enacted by this state are aligned with improving student outcomes rather than compliance with federal laws or regulations. 6. Identify barriers to academic innovation that otherwise prevent school districts from adopting effective teaching or instructional models. 7. Develop recommendations for the legislature to improve academic standards, statewide assessments, high school graduation requirements, school accountability and the public school finance formula. 8. Conduct a comprehensive study to determine the feasibility of a trade pathways diploma program for high school students who seek to enter a construction, electrical, plumbing, mechanical, utility-infrastructure or other in-demand trade.  The commission shall: (a) Identify any barriers to developing and implementing a trade pathways diploma program described in this paragraph and recommend how to address each barrier. (b) Recommend minimum course of study and competency requirements for a trade pathways diploma program described in this paragraph, including requirements that align the program with industry demand and high-demand career fields. 9. If sufficient monies are available, contract with third-party service providers as necessary to discharge the commission's duties. G. On or before December 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, the commission shall submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the chairperson of the education committee of the house of representatives, or its successor committee, and the chairperson of the education committee of the senate, or its successor committee, and shall provide a copy of the report to the secretary of state, that contains the following: 1. The status of the commission's work. 2. Recommendations for statutory, regulatory and fiscal reforms that the commission believes will support teachers, maximize student resources and improve student outcomes. H. On or before December 1, 2032, the commission shall submit a final report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, the chairperson of the education committee of the house of representatives, or its successor committee, and the chairperson of the education committee of the senate, or its successor committee, and shall provide a copy of the final report to the secretary of state, that contains the following: 1. All studies, data and information that the commission gathered and that relate to the K-12 education system in this state. 2. Recommendations for statutory, regulatory or fiscal reforms that the commission believes will improve the K-12 education system in this state. I. The state board of education and department of education shall collect and provide any data or information requested by the commission for the purposes of this section. J. This section is repealed from and after June 30, 2033. Sec. 2. Appropriation; Arizona commission on student outcomes; exemption A. The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from the classroom site fund established by section 15-977, Arizona Revised Statutes, in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028, 2028-2029, 2029-2030 and 2030-2031 to the Arizona commission on student outcomes. The commission may use up to $500,000 per year on employee-related expenses. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations, except that any unexpended and unencumbered monies remaining on June 30, 2033 revert to the classroom site fund. Sec. 3. Intent The legislature intends that: 1. The Arizona commission on student outcomes conduct a comprehensive and objective review of this state's K-12 education system to identify opportunities to improve student achievement and to strengthen accountability. 2. The review by the Arizona commission on student outcomes guide future decisions and long-term structural improvements to this state's public education system.